California statutes. Education Code
-------------------------------------------

69432.95.

(a) For purposes of this section, “qualifying institution” has the same meaning as in Section 69432.7.

(b) For the purposes of subdivision (c) “Cal Grant” means all Cal Grant awards except the Cal Grant C award.

(c) Upon the initial award and renewal of a Cal Grant award, the commission shall notify the award recipient in writing, which may include electronic mail, of both of the following:

(1) A Cal Grant award is limited to four academic years, except as provided
 in subdivision (c) of Section 69433.6.

(2) A student needs to take 15 units per semester or the equivalent quarter units, or 30 semester units or the equivalent quarter units per academic year, in order to graduate within four years.

(d) During the orientation of a new student, a qualifying institution shall notify the student in writing of the information described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (c).

(e) Upon annual registration by a student receiving state financial aid, the financial aid office of a qualifying institution shall notify that student in writing of the information described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (c).

(f) During
 online registration by a student for fewer than 15 semester units or the equivalent quarter units, the information contained in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (c) must be provided to the student with a box for the student to check acknowledging receipt of the provided information.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 758, Sec. 1.   (AB 2248)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).   Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).)
-------------------------------------------

69433.

(a) (1) A Cal Grant Program award shall be based upon the financial need of the applicant, and shall not exceed the calculated financial need for any individual applicant. The minimum level of financial need of each applicant shall be determined by the commission pursuant to Section 69432.9. The commission may provide renewal awards.

(2) A student attending a nonpublic institution shall receive a renewal award for tuition or fees, or both, in an amount not to exceed the maximum allowable award amount that was in effect in the year in which the student first received a new award.

(b) A Cal Grant award authorized pursuant to this chapter shall be defined as a full-time equivalent grant. An award to a part-time student shall be a fraction of a full-time grant, as determined by the commission.

(c) (1) The commission shall prescribe the use of standardized student financial aid applications for California. These applications shall be simple in nature, and collect common data elements required by the federal government and those elements needed to meet the objectives of state-funded and institutional financial aid programs.

(2) The applications prescribed in paragraph (1) shall be utilized for the Cal Grant Program, all other programs funded by the state or a public institution of postsecondary education (except for the Financial Assistance Program of the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges authorized by Chapter 1118 of the Statutes of 1987, for which a simplified application designed for that sole purpose may be used), and all federal programs administered by a public postsecondary education institution.

(3) Supplemental application information may be utilized if the information is essential to accomplishing the objectives of individual programs. All supplemental application information used for the purposes of commission-administered programs shall be subject to approval by the commission, and applications shall be identical for programs with similar objectives, as determined by the commission.

(4) Public postsecondary institutions are encouraged to use, but may decide whether to use, the standard applications for funds provided by private donors.

(5) The Legislature finds and declares that it is in the best interest of students that all postsecondary education institutions in California participating in federal and state-funded financial aid programs accept the standard applications prescribed by the commission.

(d) Nothing in this chapter shall prevent an individual public postsecondary institution from processing, with its own staff and fiscal resources, the standard financial aid applications specified in subdivision (c) for student aid programs for which it has legal responsibility.

(e) The commission may enter into contracts with a public agency or a private entity to improve the processing and distribution of grants, fellowships, and loans through the use of electronic networks and unified data bases.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 403, Sec. 4.   Effective September 12, 2000.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).   Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).)
-------------------------------------------

69433.2.

(a) As a condition for its voluntary participation in the Cal Grant Program, each Cal Grant participating institution, or the systemwide central office of the public postsecondary educational institution acting on behalf of the participating institution, shall, on or before March 31, 2026, and on or before March 31 of each year thereafter, annually report to the commission, and as further specified in the institutional participation agreement, both of the following for its undergraduate
 programs in order for the commission to meet the requirements of subdivision (b):

(1) (A) Enrollment, persistence, and graduation data for all students,
 disaggregated by gender, ethnicity, Pell Grant status, first generation status, transfer status, student parent status, foster youth status, and eligibility used of state financial aid received, including Cal Grant A, Cal Grant B, Cal Grant C, Cal Grant Access Awards, and Middle Class Scholarship, to the extent data is available. Data shall be redacted when the number of students is insufficient to ensure student privacy under the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (Public Law 93-280, as amended).

(B) To the extent feasible, Cal Grant participating institutions or the systemwide central office of the public postsecondary educational institution acting on behalf of the participating institution, may satisfy the reporting requirements of subparagraph (A) by submitting that data to the Cradle-to-Career Data
 System, and subsequently having the Cradle-to-Career Data System share the aggregated data with the commission, subject to privacy protection protocols that prevent redisclosure of individuals pursuant to clause (ii) of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 10867.

(2) The job placement rate and salary and wage information for each program that is either designed or advertised to lead to a particular type of job or advertised or promoted with a claim regarding job placement.

(b) The commission
 shall post both of the following on its
 internet website on or before August 1, 2026, and on or before August 1 of each year thereafter:

(1) The information submitted by a Cal Grant participating institution pursuant to subdivision (a), which shall be made available in a searchable database.

(2) Other information and links that are useful to students and parents who are in the process of selecting a college or university. This information may include, but not be limited to, local occupational profiles available through the Employment Development Department’s Labor Market Information Data Library.

(c) Data reported to the commission pursuant to subdivision (a) by postsecondary educational institutions shall be reported in a manner
 that complies with applicable federal and state laws to protect individual privacy, as determined by the postsecondary educational institution. The applicable federal and state laws to protect individual privacy shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) The federal Family Education Rights and Privacy Act of 1974 (Public Law 93-280, as amended).

(2) The federal Higher Education Act of 1965 (Public Law 89-329, as amended).

(3) The federal Privacy Act of 1974 (Public Law 93-579, as amended).

(4) The information Practices Act of 1977 (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1798) of Title 1.8 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code).

(d) Data reported to the commission
 pursuant to subdivision (a) by the Cradle-to Career Data System shall be reported in a manner that complies with federal and state privacy laws applicable to the system, as described in Section 10860.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 9, Sec. 5.   (AB 123)   Effective June 27, 2025.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).)
-------------------------------------------

69433.5.

(a) Only a resident of California, as determined by the commission pursuant to Part 41 (commencing with Section 68000), is eligible for an initial Cal Grant award. The recipient shall remain eligible for award renewal only if he or she is a California resident, in attendance, and making satisfactory academic progress at a qualifying institution, as determined by the commission.

(b) A part-time student shall not be discriminated against in the selection of Cal Grant Program award recipients, and an award to a part-time student shall be approximately proportional to the time the student spends in the instructional program, as determined by the commission. A first-time Cal Grant Program award recipient who is a part-time student shall be eligible for a full-time
 renewal award if he or she becomes a full-time student.

(c) Cal Grant Program awards shall be awarded without regard to race, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, or age.

(d) An applicant shall not receive more than one type of Cal Grant Program award concurrently. An applicant shall not:

(1) Receive one or a combination of Cal Grant Program awards in excess of the amount equivalent to the award level for a total of four years of full-time attendance in an undergraduate program, except as provided in Section 69433.6.

(2) Have obtained a baccalaureate degree
 before receiving a Cal Grant Program award.

(e) A Cal Grant Program award, except as provided in Section 69440, may only be used for educational expenses of a program of study leading directly to an undergraduate degree or certificate, or for expenses of undergraduate coursework in a program of study leading directly to a first professional degree, but for which no baccalaureate degree is awarded.

(f) The commission shall, for students who accelerate college attendance, increase the amount of award proportional to the period of additional attendance resulting from attendance in classes that fulfill requirements or electives for graduation during summer terms, sessions, or quarters. In the aggregate, the total amount a
 student may receive in a four-year period may not be increased as a result of accelerating his or her progress to a degree by attending summer terms, sessions, or quarters.

(g) The commission shall notify Cal Grant award recipients of the availability of funding for the summer term, session, or quarter through prominent notice in financial aid award letters, materials, guides, electronic information, and other means that may include, but not necessarily be limited to, surveys, newspaper articles, or attachments to communications from the commission and any other published documents.

(h) The commission may require, by the adoption of rules and regulations, the production of reports, accounting, documents, or other necessary statements from the award recipient and the college or university of attendance pertaining to the use or application of the award.

(i) A Cal Grant Program award may be utilized only at a qualifying institution.

(j) A recipient who initially qualified for both a Cal Grant A award and a Cal Grant B award, and received a Cal Grant B award, may be awarded a renewal Cal Grant A award if that recipient subsequently became ineligible for a renewal Cal Grant B award and meets the applicable Cal Grant A financial need and income and asset criteria.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 38, Sec. 62.   (SB 1016)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).   Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).)
-------------------------------------------

69433.6.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, Cal Grant A awards and Cal Grant B awards may be renewed for a total of the equivalent of four years of full-time attendance in an undergraduate program, provided that minimum financial need, as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 69432.9, continues to exist. Commencing with the 2001–02 academic year, the total number of years of eligibility for grants pursuant to this section shall be based on the student’s educational level in his or her course of study as designated by the institution of attendance when the recipient initially receives payment for a grant.

(b) (1) Commencing with the 2014–15 academic year, a recipient who was determined to be ineligible for a renewal
 award in the 2012–13 or 2013–14 academic year because he or she exceeded the maximum household income or asset level established by subdivision (k) of Section 69432.7, or failed to meet the minimum need threshold established by paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 69432.9, shall be eligible to receive a renewal award if the recipient meets all program eligibility requirements for the program from which he or she was previously disqualified and the recipient has remaining renewal award eligibility. For purposes of determining a student’s remaining renewal award eligibility, an academic year during which a student was ineligible shall reduce his or her renewal award eligibility by one full-time equivalent year.

(2) Commencing with the 2015–16 academic year, a recipient who is determined to be ineligible for a renewal award because, during the immediately preceding academic year, he or she exceeded the maximum household income or asset
 level established by subdivision (k) of Section 69432.7, or failed to meet the minimum need threshold established by paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 69432.9, shall be eligible to receive a renewal award if the recipient meets all program eligibility requirements for the program from which he or she was previously disqualified and the recipient has remaining renewal award eligibility. For purposes of determining a student’s remaining renewal award eligibility, an academic year during which a student was ineligible shall reduce his or her renewal award eligibility by one full-time equivalent year.

(c) For a student enrolled in an institutionally prescribed five-year undergraduate program, Cal Grant A awards and Cal Grant B awards may be renewed for a total of five years of full-time attendance, provided that minimum financial need, as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 69432.9, continues to exist.

(d) (1) A Cal Grant Program award recipient who has completed a baccalaureate degree, and who has been admitted to and is enrolled in a program of professional teacher preparation at an institution approved by the California Commission on Teacher Credentialing is eligible for, but not entitled to, renewal of a Cal Grant Program award for an additional year of full-time attendance, if minimum financial need, as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 69432.9, continues to exist.

(2) Payment for an additional year is limited to only those courses required for an initial teaching authorization. An award made under this subdivision may not be used for other courses.

(3) A student’s Cal Grant Program renewal eligibility shall not have lapsed more than 15 months before the payment of an
 award for purposes of this subdivision.

(e) (1) For a current or former foster youth, Cal Grant B awards may be renewed for a total of the equivalent of eight years of full-time attendance in an undergraduate program, provided that minimum financial need, as defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 69432.9, continues to exist.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “current or former foster youth” means a person whose dependency was established or continued by the court on or after the date on which the person reached 13 years of age.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 33, Sec. 12.   (AB 1809)   Effective June 27, 2018.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).   Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).)
-------------------------------------------

69433.7.

The commission shall adopt regulations necessary to implement this chapter. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commission may adopt emergency regulations pursuant to Section 11346.1 of the Government Code in order to ensure that the program enacted by this chapter may function in its first academic year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 403, Sec. 4.   Effective September 12, 2000.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).   Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).)
-------------------------------------------

69433.8.

An award under this chapter does not guarantee admission to an institution of higher education or admission to a specific campus or program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 403, Sec. 4.   Effective September 12, 2000.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).   Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).)
-------------------------------------------

69433.9.

(a) To be eligible to receive a Cal Grant award pursuant to this chapter, a student shall be all of the following:

(1) A citizen of the United States, or an eligible noncitizen, as defined for purposes of financial aid programs under Title IV of the federal Higher Education Act of 1965 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1070 et seq., as from time to time amended).

(2) Not incarcerated.

(3) Not in default on any student loan within the meaning of Section 69507.5.

(4) (A) For purposes of Article 2
 (commencing with Section 69434), Article 3 (commencing with Section 69435), and Article 4 (commencing with Section 69436), except as provided in subdivision (d) of Section 69436, at the time of high school graduation or its equivalent, be a resident of California.

(B) A student who does not meet the requirements for a high school diploma or its equivalent in the academic year immediately preceding the award year, but who meets the requirements for a high school diploma or its equivalent by December 31 of the academic year immediately following the date of application, satisfies any requirement for obtaining high school graduation or its equivalent for the purposes of this chapter as of the first day of the academic term immediately following the term in which the requirements for the high school diploma or its equivalent are met.

(C) No student shall receive an award for a term that begins before satisfying any requirement for obtaining high school graduation or its equivalent.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a student shall be eligible to receive a Cal Grant award pursuant to this chapter if the student satisfies the requirements of paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (a) and the student is a dependent natural or adopted child, stepchild, or spouse of a member of the Armed Forces of the United States stationed outside of California on active duty, if the member of the Armed Forces of the United States otherwise maintains California as their state of legal residence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 648, Sec. 2.   (SB 67)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).    Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Cal Grant A Entitlement Program [69434. - 69434.5.]

69434.

(a) A Cal Grant A award shall be used only for tuition or student fees, or both, in a for-credit instructional program with a length of not less than two academic years. Each student who meets the Cal Grant A qualifications as set forth in this article shall be guaranteed an award. The amount of any individual award is dependent on the cost of tuition or fees, or both, at the qualifying institution at which the student is enrolled. For each applicant, the award amount shall not exceed the amount of the calculated financial need.

(b) Pursuant to Section 66021.2, any California resident is entitled to a Cal Grant A award, and the commission, or a qualifying institution pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 69450), shall allocate that award, if all of the
 following criteria are met:

(1) The student has submitted, pursuant to Section 69432.9, a complete financial aid application, submitted or postmarked no later than March 2 of the academic year of high school graduation or its equivalent for the award year immediately following the academic year of high school graduation or its equivalent, or no later than March 2 of the academic year following high school graduation or its equivalent for the second award year following the year of high school graduation or its equivalent.

(2) The student demonstrates financial need pursuant to Section 69433.

(3) The student attains a high school grade point average of at least 3.0 on a four-point scale.

(4) The student’s household has an income and asset level that does
 not exceed the level for Cal Grant A recipients set forth in Section 69432.7.

(5) The student is pursuing an undergraduate academic program of not less than two academic years that is offered by a qualifying institution.

(6) The student is enrolled at least part time.

(7) The student meets the general Cal Grant eligibility requirements set forth in Article 1 (commencing with Section 69430).

(8) The student graduated from high school or its equivalent during or after the 2000–01 academic year.

(c) (1) A student who meets the Cal Grant A Entitlement Program criteria specified in this article shall receive a Cal Grant A award for tuition or fees, or both, pursuant to
 Section 66021.2.

(2) A community college student participating in a baccalaureate degree program pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 78040) of Chapter 1 of Part 48 of Division 7 who meets the Cal Grant A Entitlement Program criteria specified in this article shall receive a Cal Grant A award for upper division coursework fees pursuant to Section 66021.2.

(d) Students receiving a Cal Grant A award pursuant to this article who meet the qualifying criteria pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 69465 shall also receive an access award pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 69465).

(e) Students receiving a Cal Grant A award pursuant to this article who are not receiving an access award pursuant to subdivision (d) and
 meet the qualifying criteria pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 69470 shall also receive an access award pursuant to Article 10 (commencing with Section 69470).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 144, Sec. 21.   (AB 132)   Effective July 27, 2021.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).   Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).)
-------------------------------------------

69434.5.

(a) An individual selected for a Cal Grant A award who enrolls in a California community college may elect to have the award held in reserve for a period not to exceed two academic years, except that the commission may extend the period in which the individual’s award may be held in reserve for up to three academic years if, in the commission’s judgment, the rate of academic progress has been as rapid as could be expected for the personal and financial conditions that the student has encountered. The commission shall, in this case, hold the award in reserve for the additional year. Upon receipt of a request to transfer the award to a tuition or
 fee-charging qualifying institution, the individual shall be eligible to receive the Cal Grant A award previously held in reserve if, at the time of the request, the individual meets all of the requirements of this article. Upon receipt of the request, the commission shall reassess the financial need of the award recipient. The commission may prescribe the forms and procedures to be used for the purposes of this section. A recipient’s years of eligibility for payment of benefits shall be based upon the recipient’s grade level at the time the award is transferred to the tuition or fee-charging
 qualifying institution.

(b) (1) Individuals who are selected for a Cal Grant A award that is held in reserve pursuant to this section and who meet the qualifying criteria pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section
 69465, or who meet the qualifying criteria pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 69470, shall receive an award for access costs pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 69465) or Article 10 (commencing with Section 69470), as applicable.

(2) The access award referenced in paragraph (1) shall be provided annually to a qualifying individual during the period of time that the individual’s Cal Grant A award is held in reserve and upon transfer to a tuition or
 fee-charging qualifying institution, provided that the individual continues to meet the qualifying criteria pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section
 69465, or meet the qualifying criteria pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 69470, as applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 144, Sec. 22.   (AB 132)   Effective July 27, 2021.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).   Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Cal Grant B Entitlement Program [69435. - 69435.3.]

69435.

(a) (1) A Cal Grant B award shall be used only for tuition, student fees, and access costs in a for-credit instructional program that is not less than one academic year in length.

(2) The commission, or a qualifying institution pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 69450), shall award access grants in a student’s first academic year. In subsequent years, the award shall include an additional amount to pay tuition or fees, or both, to attend college at a public or private four-year college or university or other qualifying institution for all Cal Grant B awards pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 66021.2. In no event shall the total award in any year exceed the applicant’s calculated financial need.

(3) Not more than 2 percent of new Cal Grant B recipients enrolling for the first time in an institution of postsecondary education shall be eligible for payments for tuition or fees, or both, in their first academic year of attendance. The commission shall adopt regulations specifying the criteria used to determine which applicants, if any, receive both tuition and fees plus the access grant in the first year of enrollment. Priority shall be given to students with the lowest expected family contribution pursuant to Section 69432.7 and the highest level of academic merit.

(b) An award for access costs under this article shall be in an annual amount not to exceed one thousand five hundred fifty-one dollars ($1,551) or, if the recipient meets the qualifying criteria pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 69465, the amount of the award provided pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with
 Section
 69465), or if the recipient meets the qualifying criteria pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 69470, the amount of the award provided pursuant to Article 10 (commencing with Section 69470). These amounts may be adjusted in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 144, Sec. 23.   (AB 132)   Effective July 27, 2021.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).   Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).)
-------------------------------------------

69435.3.

(a) Any California resident is entitled to receive a Cal Grant B award, and the commission shall allocate that award pursuant to Section 66021.2, if all of the following criteria are met:

(1) (A) The student has submitted, pursuant to Section 69432.9, a complete financial aid application, submitted or postmarked no later than March 2 of the academic year of high school graduation or its equivalent for the award year immediately following the academic year of high school graduation or its equivalent, no later than March 2 of the academic year following high school graduation or its equivalent for the second award year following the year of high school graduation or its equivalent, or, if applicable to the student, pursuant to the following
 dates:

(i) No later than March 2 of the academic year immediately prior to the year for which funds would be applied, if the student is a current or former foster youth, is attending a qualifying institution that offers baccalaureate degrees, and has not yet reached 26 years of age as of July 1 of the initial award year.

(ii) No later than September 2 of the academic year for which funds would be applied, if the student is a current or former foster youth, is attending a California community college, and has not yet reached 26 years of age as of July 1 of the initial award year.

(B) For purposes of this section, “current or former foster youth” has the same meaning as specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 69433.6.

(2) The student
 demonstrates financial need pursuant to Section 69433.

(3) The student attains a high school grade point average of at least 2.0 on a four-point scale.

(4) The student’s household has an income and asset level that does not exceed the level for Cal Grant B recipients as set forth in Section 69432.7.

(5) The student is pursuing an undergraduate academic program of not less than one academic year that is offered by a qualifying institution.

(6) The student is enrolled at least part time.

(7) The student meets the general Cal Grant eligibility requirements set forth in Article 1 (commencing with Section 69430).

(8) The student
 graduated from high school or its equivalent during or after the 2000–01 academic year.

(b) A student, including a community college student participating in upper division coursework in a baccalaureate degree program pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 78040) of Chapter 1 of Part 48 of Division 7, who meets the Cal Grant B Entitlement Program or Competitive Program criteria specified in this article shall receive a Cal Grant B award for access costs and tuition and fees, as applicable, pursuant to Section 66021.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 33, Sec. 13.   (AB 1809)   Effective June 27, 2018.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).   Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. California Community College Expanded Entitlement Program [69435.5. - 69435.5.]

69435.5.

(a) Commencing with the 2021–22 academic year, a student who was not awarded a Cal Grant A or B award pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 69434) or Article 3 (commencing with Section 69435) at the time of the student’s high school graduation but will be enrolled at a California community college during the award year and meets all of the criteria set forth in subdivision (b) shall be entitled to a Cal Grant A or B award.

(b) (1) To receive a Cal Grant A award under this article, an applicant shall be enrolled at a California community college during the award year and meet all of the requirements of Article 2 (commencing with Section 69434), with the exception of paragraphs (1) and (8) of subdivision (b) of Section 69434. However,
 in lieu of meeting the grade point average requirement set forth in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 69434, an applicant may submit a community college or college grade point average of at least 2.4 on a 4.0 scale.

(2) To receive a Cal Grant B award under this article, an applicant shall be enrolled at a California community college during the award year and meet all of the requirements of Article 3 (commencing with Section 69435), with the exception of paragraphs (1) and (8) of subdivision (a) of Section 69435.3. However, in lieu of meeting the grade point average requirements of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 69435.3, a student may do either of the following:

(A) Demonstrate attainment of a community college or college grade point average of at least 2.0 on a 4.0 scale.

(B) Reestablish the
 student’s grade point average by completing at least 16 cumulative units of credit for academic coursework at an accredited California community college, as defined by the commission, by regulation, with at least a 2.0 community college grade point average.

(c) (1) The commission shall use the standardized student financial aid application described in Section 69432.9.

(2) An official financial aid application shall be submitted pursuant to Section 69432.9 and submitted or postmarked no later than September 2 of the academic year for which funds would be applied.

(d) Cal Grant A and B awards shall be used only for the purposes set forth in Article 2 (commencing with Section 69434) and Article 3 (commencing with Section 69435), respectively.

(e) (1) A student who receives an award under this article may subsequently transfer to a University of California or California State University campus and remain eligible to receive the award, if the student meets all other requirements of this article and the general Cal Grant eligibility requirements set forth in Article 1 (commencing with Section 69430).

(2) A student who receives an award under this article and subsequently transfers to an independent institution of higher education or a private for-profit postsecondary educational institution shall not remain eligible to receive an award under this article. The student shall remain eligible to apply for a California Community College Transfer Entitlement Award under Article 4 (commencing with Section 69436) or a Competitive Cal Grant A or B award under Article 5 (commencing with Section 69437), if the student meets all requirements of the relevant
 article and the general Cal Grant eligibility requirements set forth in Article 1 (commencing with Section 69430).

(f) (1) An individual selected for a Cal Grant A award who enrolls in a California community college may elect to have the award held in reserve for a period not to exceed two academic years, except that the commission may extend the period in which the individual’s award may be held in reserve for up to three academic years if, in the commission’s judgment, the rate of academic progress has been as rapid as could be expected for the personal and financial conditions that the student has encountered. The commission shall, in this case, hold the award in reserve for the additional year. Upon receipt of a request to transfer the award to a University of California or California State University campus, the individual shall be eligible to receive the Cal Grant A award previously held in reserve if, at the time of
 the request, the individual meets all of the requirements of this article. Upon receipt of the request, the commission shall reassess the financial need of the award recipient. The commission may prescribe the forms and procedures to be used for purposes of this section. A recipient’s years of eligibility for payment of benefits shall be based upon the recipient’s grade level at the time the award is transferred to the tuition or fee-charging qualifying institution.

(2) (A) Individuals selected for a Cal Grant A award that is held in reserve pursuant to this subdivision who meet the qualifying criteria pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 69465 shall receive an award for access costs pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 69465).

(B) The access award referenced in subparagraph (A) shall be provided annually to qualifying individuals during the
 period of time that their Cal Grant A award is held in reserve and upon transfer to a tuition or fee-charging qualifying institution, provided that the individual continues to meet the qualifying criteria pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 69465.

(3) (A) Individuals selected for a Cal Grant A award that is held in reserve pursuant to this subdivision who are not receiving an award for access costs pursuant to paragraph (2) and meet the qualifying criteria pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 69470 shall receive an award for access costs pursuant to Article 10 (commencing with Section 69470).

(B) The access award referenced in subparagraph (A) shall be provided annually to qualifying individuals during the period of time that their Cal Grant A award is held in reserve and upon transfer to a tuition or fee-charging qualifying institution, provided that
 the individual continues to meet the qualifying criteria pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 69470.

(g) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2024, and, as of January 1, 2025, is repealed, only if General Fund moneys over the multiyear forecasts beginning in the 2024–25 fiscal year are available to support ongoing augmentations and actions, and if funding is provided in the annual Budget Act for this purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 54, Sec. 10.   (AB 183)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Conditionally inoperative on July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.   Conditionally repealed on January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed in Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).   Repealed conditionally pursuant to Section 69475 (if it becomes operative).   See later operative version added by Sec. 11 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 54.)
-------------------------------------------

69435.5.

(a) Commencing with the 2021–22 academic year, a student who was not awarded a Cal Grant A or B award pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 69434) or Article 3 (commencing with Section 69435) at the time of the student’s high school graduation but will be enrolled at a California community college during the award year and meets all of the criteria set forth in subdivision (b) shall be entitled to a Cal Grant A or B award.

(b) (1) To receive a Cal Grant A award under this article, an applicant shall be enrolled at a California community college during the award year and meet all of the requirements of Article 2 (commencing with Section 69434), with the exception of paragraphs (1) and (8) of subdivision (b) of
 Section 69434. However, in lieu of meeting the grade point average requirement set forth in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 69434, an applicant may submit a community college or college grade point average of at least 2.4 on a 4.0 scale.
